District of Columbia statutes.
35-302

Contributory negligence no bar to recovery.

In all actions brought against any common carriers to recover damages for personal injuries to an employee, or where such injuries have resulted in his death, the fact that the employee may have been guilty of contributory negligence shall not bar a recovery where his contributed negligence was slight and that of the employer was gross in comparison, but the damages shall be diminished by the jury in proportion to the amount of negligence attributable to such employee. All questions of negligence and contributory negligence shall be for the jury.

June 11, 1906, 34 Stat. 232, ch. 3073, § 2

History

1981 Ed., § 44-402.
1973 Ed., § 44-402.

Prior Codifications